Hawaii statutes.
§457-2 Definitions. (a) As used in
this chapter unless the content otherwise requires:

"Advanced practice registered nurse"
means a registered nurse who has met the qualifications for advanced practice
registered nurse licensure set forth in this chapter and through rules of the
board, which shall include educational requirements.

"Board" means the state board of
nursing.

"Competency"
means the ability of a nurse to integrate knowledge, skills, judgment and
personal attributes to practice safely and ethically in the professional
nursing position and in accordance with the scope of nationally recognized
nursing practices.

"Contact hour" means the same as section 16-89-2,
Hawaii Administrative Rules.

"Continuing competency" means the long-term
educational and professional process by which an individual undertakes and
documents with verifiable evidence a personal learning plan that encompasses a
periodic self-assessment of personal strengths and weaknesses as present in the
individual's practice as a nurse as well as a commitment to furthering the
individual's professional knowledge relating to the nursing field.

"Distant site" [Definition
effective January 1, 2017.] means the location of the nurse delivering
services through telehealth at the time the services are provided.

"Licensure and discipline data" means
identifying information that includes but is not limited to the licensee's
name, address, social security number, date of birth, and nursing education.

"NCSBN" means the National Council of
State Boards of Nursing.

"Nurse" means a person licensed under
this chapter or a person who holds a license under the laws of another state or
territory of the United States that is equivalent to a license under this
chapter.

"Nursys" means an integrated process
for collecting, storing, and sharing information on nurse licensure and
enforcement activities related to nurse licensure laws that is administered by
a nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by licensing boards.

"Originating site" [Definition
effective January 1, 2017.] means
the location where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a
health care provider, at the time services are provided by a nurse through
telehealth, including but not limited to a nurse's or health care provider's
office, hospital, health care facility, a patient's home, and other non-medical
environments such as school-based health centers, university-based health
centers, or the work location of a patient.

"Telehealth" [Definition effective
until December 31, 2016. For definition effective January 1, 2017, see below.] means the use of electronic information
and telecommunication technologies to support long-distance clinical health
care, patient and professional health-related education, public health and
health administration, to the extent that it relates to nursing.

"Telehealth" [Definition effective
January 1, 2017. For definition effective until December 31, 2016, see above.]
means the use of telecommunications as that term is defined in section 269-1,
to encompass four modalities: store and forward technologies, remote
monitoring, live consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but
not be limited to real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure
interactive and non-interactive web-based communication, and secure
asynchronous information exchange, to transmit patient medical information,
including diagnostic-quality digital images and laboratory results for medical
interpretation and diagnosis, to support long-distance clinical health care while
a patient is at an originating site and the nurse is at a distant site, patient
and professional health-related education, public health and health
administration, to the extent that it relates to nursing.

"The practice of nursing as a licensed
practical nurse" [Repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2017 by L 2012, c
255, §5 deleted by L 2016, c 2, §2.] means the performance of those acts
commensurate with the required educational preparation and demonstrated
competency of the individual, whereby the individual shall be accountable and
responsible to the consumer for the quality of nursing care rendered. The
foregoing may include, but shall not be limited to: implementation of basic
nursing procedures in the plan of care; observing and caring for individuals at
all levels of the health spectrum, giving counsel and acting to safeguard life
and health and functioning as a part of the health care team, under the
direction of a dentist, physician, osteopathic physician, registered nurse, or
podiatrist licensed in accordance with chapter 448, 453, 457, or 463E, or under
the orders of a physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 453,
practicing with physician supervision as required by chapter 453, and acting as
the agent of the supervising physician; administration of treatment and
medication as prescribed; promotion of health maintenance of individuals,
families, or groups; or teaching and supervision of auxiliary personnel.

"The practice of nursing as a registered
nurse" [Repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2017 by L 2012, c 255, §5
deleted by L 2016, c 2, §2.] means the performance of professional services
commensurate with the educational preparation and demonstrated competency of
the individual having specialized knowledge, judgment, and skill based on the
principles of the biological, physical, behavioral, and sociological sciences
and nursing theory, whereby the individual shall be accountable and responsible
to the consumer for the quality of nursing care rendered. The foregoing may include
but shall not be limited to observation, assessment, development,
implementation, and evaluation of a plan of care, health counseling,
supervision and teaching of other personnel, and teaching of individuals,
families, and groups in any stage of health or illness; administration,
supervision, coordination, delegation, and evaluation of nursing practice;
provision of health care to the patient in collaboration with other members of
the health care team as autonomous health care professionals providing the
nursing component of health care; or use of reasonable judgment in carrying out
prescribed medical orders of a licensed dentist, physician, osteopathic
physician, or podiatrist licensed in accordance with chapter 448, 453, or 463E;
orders of an advanced practice registered nurse licensed in accordance with
this chapter; or the orders of a physician assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 453, practicing with physician supervision as required by chapter 453,
and acting as the agent of the supervising physician.

(b) Definitions applicable to this chapter shall also
include those used in the NCSBN Model Nursing Practice Act and the Model
Nursing Administrative Rules unless the context otherwise requires. Where a
definition in the NCSBN Model Nursing Practice Act or Model Nursing
Administrative Rules conflicts with a definition in [this] chapter or 436B, the
definitions contained in [this] chapter or 436B and the rules of the board
shall apply. [L 1970, c 71, pt of §1; am L 1985, c 238, §1; am L 1994, c
277, §§3, 4; am L 1996, c 150, §1; am L 2000, c 9, §1; am L 2009, c 11, §61; am
L 2010, c 57, §5; am L 2012, c 255, §2; am L 2014, c 46, §3; am L 2015, c 127,
§3; am L 2016, c 18, §3 and c 226, §11]

Cross References

Practice of telemedicine by physicians, see §453-1.3.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next